Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Penalties

395.990.
Penalties.

Any fiduciary failing, without good cause therefor, to file his inventory or account as required by notice given pursuant to KRS

395.255

shall be fined by the court, for each day he neglects or refuses after the date fixed in said notice, the sum of ten dollars ($10), to be collected by rule or other process.

History.

3857: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 167, §§ 12, 24.